North Carolina statutes. Chapter 60. Railroads and Other Carriers.
§§ 60-1 through 60-146.
[Repealed]

Repealed and transferred by Session Laws 1963, c. 1165.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1963, c. 1165, amended, revised and rewrote Chapters 56, 60 and 62 of the General Statutes and recodified them as a new Chapter 62 and a new Chapter 74A.

G.S. 60-1

to 60-81 and G.S. 60-88 to 60-146 were repealed by Session Laws 1963, c. 1165, s. 1. G.S. 60-82 to 60-87 were transferred to

G.S. 74A-1

to 74A-6 by Session Laws 1963, c. 1165, s. 2.